Washington statutes.
RCW 6.21.080

Redemption rights—Sale of short term leasehold and vendor's interest under real estate contract absolute.

A sale of a real property estate of less than a leasehold of two years unexpired term and a sale of a vendor's interest in real property being sold under a real estate contract shall be absolute. In all other cases, real property shall be sold subject to redemption, as provided in chapter 6.23 RCW.

[ 1987 c 442 s 608; 1899 c 53 s 5; RRS s 584. Formerly RCW 6.24.030.]